Washington statutes.
RCW 38.56.060

Emergency responder—Not an employee of a requesting member jurisdiction.

An emergency responder is not an employee of the requesting member jurisdiction and is not entitled to any right, privilege, or benefit of employment from the requesting member jurisdiction, including but not limited to, compensation, wages, salary, leave, pensions, health, or other advantage.

[ 2011 c 79 s 6.]